West Virginia, session 2026, HB4851.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-5-13e. Moratorium on school closures and consolidations pending WVDE school aid formula proposal. (a) The West Virginia Department of Education ("WVDE") shall review the closures and consolidations of schools that are under consideration during the current year, and previous four fiscal years, and propose to the Legislature such changes to the School Aid Formula as would be, or would have been, likely to prevent the closure of no fewer than 80% of those under current or previous consideration, regardless of any decisions rendered to date by school districts, when such justification for closure was predicated on financial and operational factors.(b) There shall be a statewide moratorium on all public-school closures and consolidations for all reasons other than catastrophic structural failure or ongoing, unresolvable safety and health hazards, until a proposal to revise the School Aid Formula is received by Legislature, and subsequent action be taken by Legislature directly related to implementation or rejection of such recommendations.(c) This section shall take effect from passage.